Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.370

General powers, rights, privileges of association.

An association may do each and every thing necessary, suitable or proper for the accomplishment of any one of the purposes or the attainment of any one or more of the objects enumerated in this chapter; or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association; and contract accordingly; and in addition exercise and possess all powers, rights and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged; and, in addition, any other rights, powers and privileges granted by the laws of this state to ordinary corporations, except such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter; and do any such thing anywhere.

[ 1959 c 312 s 37.]